Utah statutes.
76-4-202.   Conspiracy -- Classification of offenses.

Conspiracy to commit:

(1)  a capital felony is a first degree felony;

(2)  a first degree felony is a second degree felony; except that conspiracy to commit child kidnaping, in violation of Section 76-5-301.1 or to commit any of those felonies described in Title 76, Chapter 5, Part 4, which are first degree felonies, is a first degree felony punishable by imprisonment for an indeterminate term of not less than three years and which may be for life;

(3)  a second degree felony is a third degree felony;

(4)  a third degree felony is a class A misdemeanor;

(5)  a class A misdemeanor is a class B misdemeanor;

(6)  a class B misdemeanor is a class C misdemeanor;

(7)  A class C misdemeanor is punishable by a penalty not exceeding one half the penalty for a class C misdemeanor.

